static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG num
SFX 282 Y 90 # +Past+PxSg3
SFX 282 0 лек . +Der/лыҡ
SFX 282 0 лектәр . +Der/лыҡ+Pl
SFX 282 0 лектең . +Der/лыҡ+Gen
SFX 282 0 леккә . +Der/лыҡ+Dat
SFX 282 0 лекте . +Der/лыҡ+Acc
SFX 282 0 лектән . +Der/лыҡ+Abl
SFX 282 0 лектә . +Der/лыҡ+Loc
SFX 282 0 лектәрҙең . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+Gen
SFX 282 0 лектәргә . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+Dat
SFX 282 0 лектәрҙе . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+Acc
SFX 282 0 лектәрҙән . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+Abl
SFX 282 0 лектәрҙә . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+Loc
SFX 282 0 лектәрем . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg1
SFX 282 0 лектәрең . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg2
SFX 282 0 лектәре . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg3
SFX 282 0 лектәребеҙ . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxPl1
SFX 282 0 лектәрегеҙ . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxPl2
SFX 282 0 лектәремдең . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg1+Gen
SFX 282 0 лектәреңдең . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg2+Gen
SFX 282 0 лектәренең . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg3+Gen
SFX 282 0 лектәребеҙҙең . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxPl1+Gen
SFX 282 0 лектәрегеҙҙең . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxPl2+Gen
SFX 282 0 лектәремә . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg1+Dat
SFX 282 0 лектәреңә . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg2+Dat
SFX 282 0 лектәренә . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg3+Dat
SFX 282 0 лектәребеҙгә . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxPl1+Dat
SFX 282 0 лектәрегеҙгә . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxPl2+Dat
SFX 282 0 лектәремде . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg1+Acc
SFX 282 0 лектәреңде . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg2+Acc
SFX 282 0 лектәрен . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg3+Acc
SFX 282 0 лектәрендәй . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg3+Acc+Der/дай
SFX 282 0 лектәребеҙҙе . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxPl1+Acc
SFX 282 0 лектәрегеҙҙе . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxPl2+Acc
SFX 282 0 лектәремдән . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg1+Abl
SFX 282 0 лектәреңдән . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg2+Abl
SFX 282 0 лектәренән . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg3+Abl
SFX 282 0 лектәребеҙҙән . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxPl1+Abl
SFX 282 0 лектәрегеҙҙән . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxPl2+Abl
SFX 282 0 лектәремдә . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg1+Loc
SFX 282 0 лектәреңдә . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg2+Loc
SFX 282 0 лектәрендә . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxSg3+Loc
SFX 282 0 лектәребеҙҙә . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxPl1+Loc
SFX 282 0 лектәрегеҙҙә . +Der/лыҡ+Pl+PxPl2+Loc
SFX 282 0 лекмен . +Der/лыҡ+Pred1Sg
SFX 282 0 лекһең . +Der/лыҡ+Pred2Sg
SFX 282 0 лекбеҙ . +Der/лыҡ+Pred1Pl
SFX 282 0 лекһегеҙ . +Der/лыҡ+Pred2Pl
SFX 282 0 лекем . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg1
SFX 282 0 лекемдең . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg1+Gen
SFX 282 0 лекемә . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg1+Dat
SFX 282 0 лекемде . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg1+Acc
SFX 282 0 лекемдән . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg1+Abl
SFX 282 0 лекемдә . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg1+Loc
SFX 282 0 лекең . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg2
SFX 282 0 лекеңдең . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg2+Gen
SFX 282 0 лекеңә . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg2+Dat
SFX 282 0 лекеңде . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg2+Acc
SFX 282 0 лекеңдән . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg2+Abl
SFX 282 0 лекеңдә . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg2+Loc
SFX 282 0 леке . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg3
SFX 282 0 лекенең . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg3+Gen
SFX 282 0 лекенә . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg3+Dat
SFX 282 0 лекен . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg3+Acc
SFX 282 0 лекендәй . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg3+Acc+Der/дай
SFX 282 0 лекенән . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg3+Abl
SFX 282 0 лекендә . +Der/лыҡ+PxSg3+Loc
SFX 282 0 лекебеҙ . +Der/лыҡ+PxPl1
SFX 282 0 лекебеҙҙең . +Der/лыҡ+PxPl1+Gen
SFX 282 0 лекебеҙгә . +Der/лыҡ+PxPl1+Dat
SFX 282 0 лекебеҙҙе . +Der/лыҡ+PxPl1+Acc
SFX 282 0 лекебеҙҙән . +Der/лыҡ+PxPl1+Abl
SFX 282 0 лекебеҙҙә . +Der/лыҡ+PxPl1+Loc
SFX 282 0 лекегеҙ . +Der/лыҡ+PxPl2
SFX 282 0 лекегеҙҙең . +Der/лыҡ+PxPl2+Gen
SFX 282 0 лекегеҙгә . +Der/лыҡ+PxPl2+Dat
SFX 282 0 лекегеҙҙе . +Der/лыҡ+PxPl2+Acc
SFX 282 0 лекегеҙҙән . +Der/лыҡ+PxPl2+Abl
SFX 282 0 лекегеҙҙә . +Der/лыҡ+PxPl2+Loc
SFX 282 0 лекме . +Der/лыҡ+Q
SFX 282 0 лекмелер . +Der/лыҡ+Q+Indf
SFX 282 0 лектер . +Der/лыҡ+Indf
SFX 282 0 лексе . +Der/лыҡ+Clt/сы
SFX 282 0 лектеке . +Der/лыҡ+Poss
SFX 282 0 леккәй . +Der/лыҡ+Dim
SFX 282 0 лектәй . +Der/лыҡ+Der/дай
SFX 282 0 лексә . +Der/лыҡ+Der/са
SFX 282 0 лектәге . +Der/лыҡ+Der/дағы
SFX 282 0 лекле . +Der/лыҡ+Der/лы
SFX 282 0 лекһеҙ . +Der/лыҡ+Abe
SFX 282 0 леккәсә . +Der/лыҡ+Der/ҡаса

SFX 283 Y 3 # V01 Fut+
SFX 283 0 мы . +Q
SFX 283 0 дыр . +Indf
SFX 283 0 сы . +Clt/сы

SFX 284 Y 3 # V02 Fut+
SFX 284 0 ме . +Q
SFX 284 0 дер . +Indf
SFX 284 0 се . +Clt/сы

SFX 285 Y 3 # V03 Fut+
SFX 285 0 мо . +Q
SFX 285 0 дор . +Indf
SFX 285 0 со . +Clt/сы

SFX 286 Y 3 # V04 Fut+
SFX 286 0 мө . +Q
SFX 286 0 дөр . +Indf
SFX 286 0 сө . +Clt/сы

SFX 287 Y 3 # V05 Fut+
SFX 287 0 мы . +Q
SFX 287 0 ҙыр . +Indf
SFX 287 0 сы . +Clt/сы

SFX 288 Y 3 # V06 Fut+
SFX 288 0 ме . +Q
SFX 288 0 ҙер . +Indf
SFX 288 0 се . +Clt/сы

SFX 289 Y 3 # V07 Fut+
SFX 289 0 мо . +Q
SFX 289 0 ҙор . +Indf
SFX 289 0 со . +Clt/сы

SFX 290 Y 3 # V08 Fut+
SFX 290 0 мө . +Q
SFX 290 0 ҙөр . +Indf
SFX 290 0 сө . +Clt/сы

SFX 291 Y 3 # V10 Fut+
SFX 291 0 ме . +Q
SFX 291 0 лер . +Indf
SFX 291 0 се . +Clt/сы

SFX 292 Y 3 # V11 Fut+
SFX 292 0 мо . +Q
SFX 292 0 лор . +Indf
SFX 292 0 со . +Clt/сы

SFX 293 Y 3 # V13 Fut+
SFX 293 0 мы . +Q
SFX 293 0 тыр . +Indf
SFX 293 0 сы . +Clt/сы

SFX 294 Y 3 # V14 Fut+
SFX 294 0 ме . +Q
SFX 294 0 тер . +Indf
SFX 294 0 се . +Clt/сы

SFX 295 Y 3 # V15 Fut+
SFX 295 0 мо . +Q
SFX 295 0 тор . +Indf
SFX 295 0 со . +Clt/сы

SFX 296 Y 2 # V01 Opt2+
SFX 296 0 мы . +Q
SFX 296 0 дыр . +Indf

SFX 297 Y 2 # V02 Opt2+
SFX 297 0 ме . +Q
SFX 297 0 дер . +Indf

SFX 298 Y 2 # V03 Opt2+
SFX 298 0 мо . +Q
SFX 298 0 дор . +Indf

SFX 299 Y 2 # V04 Opt2+
SFX 299 0 мө . +Q
SFX 299 0 дөр . +Indf

SFX 300 Y 2 # V09 Opt2+
SFX 300 0 мы . +Q
SFX 300 0 лыр . +Indf

SFX 301 Y 2 # V10 Opt2+
SFX 301 0 ме . +Q
SFX 301 0 лер . +Indf

SFX 302 Y 2 # V11 Opt2+
SFX 302 0 мо . +Q
SFX 302 0 лор . +Indf

SFX 303 Y 2 # V12 Opt2+
SFX 303 0 мө . +Q
SFX 303 0 лөр . +Indf

SFX 304 Y 2 # V01 FutPlan+
SFX 304 0 мы . +Q
SFX 304 0 дыр . +Indf

SFX 305 Y 2 # V02 FutPlan+
SFX 305 0 ме . +Q
SFX 305 0 дер . +Indf

SFX 306 Y 2 # V05 FutPlan+
SFX 306 0 мы . +Q
SFX 306 0 ҙыр . +Indf

SFX 307 Y 2 # V06 FutPlan+
SFX 307 0 ме . +Q
SFX 307 0 ҙер . +Indf

SFX 308 Y 2 # V09 FutPlan+
SFX 308 0 мы . +Q
SFX 308 0 лыр . +Indf

SFX 309 Y 2 # V10 FutPlan+
SFX 309 0 ме . +Q
SFX 309 0 лер . +Indf

SFX 310 Y 2 # V15 FutPlan+
SFX 310 0 мо . +Q
SFX 310 0 тор . +Indf

SFX 311 Y 3 # V09 GerPerf+
SFX 311 0 мы . +Q
SFX 311 0 лыр . +Indf
SFX 311 0 сы . +Clt/сы

SFX 312 Y 3 # V10 GerPerf+
SFX 312 0 ме . +Q
SFX 312 0 лер . +Indf
SFX 312 0 се . +Clt/сы

SFX 313 Y 3 # V13 GerPerf+
SFX 313 0 мы . +Q
SFX 313 0 тыр . +Indf
SFX 313 0 сы . +Clt/сы

SFX 314 Y 3 # V14 GerPerf+
SFX 314 0 ме . +Q
SFX 314 0 тер . +Indf
SFX 314 0 се . +Clt/сы

SFX 315 Y 3 # V15 GerPerf+
SFX 315 0 мо . +Q
SFX 315 0 тор . +Indf
SFX 315 0 со . +Clt/сы

SFX 316 Y 3 # V16 GerPerf+
SFX 316 0 мө . +Q
SFX 316 0 төр . +Indf
SFX 316 0 сө . +Clt/сы

SFX 317 Y 3 # V09 Inf+
SFX 317 0 мы . +Q
SFX 317 0 лыр . +Indf
SFX 317 0 сы . +Clt/сы

SFX 318 Y 3 # V10 Inf+
SFX 318 0 ме . +Q
SFX 318 0 лер . +Indf
SFX 318 0 се . +Clt/сы

SFX 319 Y 1 # звукоподражательное слово Descr
SFX 319 0 0 . [Descr]

SFX 320 Y 1 # звательное слово
SFX 320 0 0 . [Voc]

SFX 321 Y 1 # вводное слово
SFX 321 0 0 . [Ger/Sim]

SFX 322 Y 2 # модальное слово
SFX 322 0 0 . [Mod]
SFX 322 0 ме . [Mod] +Q

SFX 323 Y 1 # в функции вспомагательного глагола
SFX 323 0 0 . [Verb]
