static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.dic
алғанда/321
алғанда/322
шунда/322
ҡайҙа/322
на/320
булыуынса/321
башлыса/322
та/321
та-та/319
туҡта/321
трататта/319
булмаһа/322
улайһа/321
булһа/321
шикһеҙ/321
шөбһәһеҙ/321
себе/320
деге-деге/319
деге-деге/320
дөрөҫөрәге/322
инде/321
эйе/322
эйе-эйе/322
геле-геле/320
билгеле/321
шикелле/322
билдәле/321
ине/323
әйтмәксе/321
әлләсе/321
әһе/322
йәнәһе/321
ҡаж-ҡаж/319
шаж/319
ҡаж-ғож/319
саж-сож/319
гөж-гөж/319
гөж-гөж/320
выж/319
жыж/319
пыж/319
тыж/319
без/319
быз/319
мыз/319
эз/319
кәз-гәз/320
тәбиғи/321
бәлки/321
кли-кли-кли/319
бәли/322
үти-үти/319
үти-үти/320
билләһи/321
китағай/322
буғай/322
шулай/322
ярамай/322
уңай/321
ярай/322
шай/322
липей-липей/320
кетей-кетей/319
кетей-кетей/320
шай-шой/319
жый/319
мыр-мырый/319
ҡытый-ҡытый/319
әйткәндәй/322
әүкәй/320
кешкәй-кешкәй/320
икенселәй/321
әйтмешләй/321
тәштәй-тәштәй/320
шәй/321
әйтәйек/321
кемгәлек/322
тек/319
бөлк-бөлк/319
бәлк/319
теңк-теңк/319
өңк-өңк/319
сәңк-сәңк/319
көрк-көрк/319
кикирикүк/319
ки-ке-ру-у-у-у-күк/319
сү-үк/320
ки-ки-ри-кү-ү-ү-к/319
тимәк/321
кәрәк/321
кәрәк/322
сәк-сәк/319
тәк/322
ҡыйғаҡ-ҡыйғаҡ/319
ҡаҡ-ҡаҡ-ҡаҡ/319
булараҡ/321
аптыраҡ/321
ҡыт-ҡытаҡ/319
ҡажҡ/319
быжҡ/319
ҡыжҡ-ҡыжҡ/319
ҡи-ҡи-ҡиҡ/319
тор-ройҡ/319
зыйҡ/319
мыйҡ-мыйҡ/319
балҡ-балҡ/319
ҡолҡ/319
шулҡ-шулҡ/319
ҡылҡ/319
ҡаңҡ/319
саңҡ-саңҡ/319
даңҡ-доңҡ/319
дуңҡ/319
ыңҡ/319
ыңҡ-ыңҡ/319
сыңҡ/322
тыңҡ/319
таҡ-тоҡ/319
ҡарҡ/319
борҡ/319
сорҡ-сорҡ/319
хорҡ-хорҡ/319
шурҡ-шурҡ/319
лырҡ-лырҡ/319
шырҡ/319
ласҡ-лосҡ/319
тысҡ-тысҡ/319
таҡ-туҡ/319
мышҡ-мышҡ/319
ҡыҙыҡ/321
зыҡ/319
шыҡырыҡ/319
тыҡ/319
шыҡ-шыҡ/319
юҡ/321
юҡ/322
ихтимал/321
сеңгел-сеңгел/319
түгел/322
әлхасил/321
сыңғыл/319
гәл-гәл/320
тра-та-та-там/319
исмаһам/322
кем/321
бәлкем/321
сем-сем/319
йым/319
вәғәләйкүмәссәләм/321
әйтәм/321
мәйтәм/321
ваҡиған/322
ваҡыйған/321
ҡайҙан/322
фаразан/321
тайпан-тойпан/319
хайран/321
тыртан-тыртан/319
мөмкин/322
моғайын/322
тегән-тегән/320
берҙән/321
кәлйән-көлйән/319
икән/323,96
мәҫәлән/321
ғөмүмән/322
икенсенән/321
беренсенән/321
өсөнсөнән/321
ирән/323
елтән-елтән/319
саң/319
баҡһаң/322
зең/319
нишләйһең/321
күрәһең/321
енң/319
заң-зоң/319
дөң/319
зың/319
сың-сың-сың/319
баҡтиһәң/322
әләйһәң/321
шаҡы-шоҡо/319
гөлө-гөлө/320
дөрөҫө/322
ҡап-ҡап/319
харап/322
сап/319
леп/319
килеп/321
леп-леп/320
пип/319
тип-тип/319
ялп-йолп/319
йәлп-йөлп/319
йылп/319
йәлп/319
ялп-ялп/319
дөмп-дөмп/319
дымп-дымп/319
ҡоп-ҡоп/319
тап-топ/319
шап-шоп/319
дөп-дөп/319
лөп-лөп/319
төп/319
шорп-шорп/319
һөрп/319
йырп-йырп/319
суп/319
хуп/322
һуп/319
ҡып-ҡып/319
тып/319
ләп/319
тәп-тәп/319
тар-мар/319
шуңар/322
зинһар/321
ғор-шар/319
деңгер/319
селдер-селдер/319
зер-зер/319
семер/319
сер-сер/319
сетер/319
селтер/319
лүтер-лүтер/319
имештер/322
домбор/319
шамбыр-шомбор/319
собор/319
шабыр-шобор/319
даңғыр-доңғор/319
боғор-боғор/319
шағыр-шоғор/319
ҡоҙор-ҡоҙор/319
ҡор-ҡор/319
хопор/319
шопор-шопор/319
тасыр-тосор/319
салтыр-солтор/319
ҡотор-ҡотор/319
шатор-шотор/319
ҡаптыр-ҡоптор/319
ластыр-лостор/319
шаштыр-шоштор/319
шор/319
йәлбер-йөлбөр/319
дөмбөр-дөмбөр/319
дөбөр-дөбөр/319
гөр/319
ҡәңгер-көңгөр/319
мөгөр-мөгөр/319
гөлдөр/319
сөкөр-сөкөр/319
шөпөр-шөпөр/319
көлтөр/319
сәтер-сөтөр/319
ҡарр/319
ҡарррр/319
тр-р/319
мыр-мыр-р/319
тырр/320
тыр-тыр-р/319
шабыр/319
шамбыр/319
субыр-субыр/319
ҡыбыр-ҡыбыр/319
ғыр/319
доңғор-даңғыр/319
дуңғыр/319
дыңғыр-дыңғыр/319
ҡыңғыр-ҡыңғыр/319
тыңғыр-тыңғыр/319
буғыр-буғыр/319
лығыр-лығыр/319
ығыр-шығыр/319
дыр-дыр/319
зыр-зыр/319
тыҡыр/319
мыр/319
сымыр-сымыр/319
супыр-супыр/319
тыпыр/319
сатыр/319
салтыр/319
сылтыр/319
ҡаптыр/319
туптыр-туптыр/319
тыптыр-тыптыр/319
быстыр-быстыр/319
көштөр-ҡаштыр/319
ҡыштыр/319
шыштыр-шыштыр/319
ҡытыр-ҡытыр/319
пытыр-пытыр/319
шытыр-шытыр/319
хыр-хыр/319
дыһыр-дыһыр/319
бәр-бәр-бәр/320
сәр/319
ихлас/321
бес-бес/319
бес-бес/320
лас-лос/319
көс-көс/320
төс-төс/319
төс-төс/320
һөс/320
берс/320
ҡыҙғаныс/321
бәс/321
икәс/323
имәс/322
тәс-тәс/319
тәс-тәс/320
дөрөҫ/322
дөрҫ-дарҫ/319
дорҫ/319
гөрҫ/319
бурҫ-бурҫ/319
тырҫ-мырҫ/319
дәрҫ-дәрҫ/320
ыҫҫ/319
бәҫ/321
тәҫ-тәҫ/320
кет-кет/319
ғыжт/319
бит/322
әйбит/322
ҡорайт/320
айт-һайт/319
зыйт/319
шыйт/319
һөләйт/320
шәйт/322
шалт/319
пелт/319
ғолт-ғолт/319
салт-солт/319
гөлт-гөлт/319
бүлт/319
йылт/319
ҡылт-мылт/319
шылт/319
ҡот-ҡот/319
сөт/320
шарт/319
лерт-лерт/319
терт-терт/319
шорт/319
бырт/319
ҡырт-мырт/319
сырт-сырт/319
шырт/319
ласт/319
тут/319
сыт-сыт/319
ниһайәт/321
шайәт/322
шәйәт/322
шәт/322
лау-лау/319
фиу-фиу-фиу/319
уһу/319
сыр-сыу/319
деү-деү/319
тшү/320
бәү-бәү/319
беҙәү/320
зәб-зәб-зәү/320
зәп-зәп-зәү/320
һәү-һәү/320
мәғәттәсеф/322
пуф/319
бах-бах-бах/320
бох-бох/320
борх/319
ух-ух-ух/319
ҡаһ-ҡаһ/319
иншаллаһ/321
маһ-маһ/320
гөрһ/319
тейеш/322
имеш/322
көш/320
көш-көш/320
өш-өш/320
ҡорш/319
ғырш/319
шыш-быш/319
келәш-келәш/320
баяғы/322
әлеге-баяғы/322
ҡы/322
тыҡы-тыҡы/319
аҙаплы/321
асылы/321
ахыры/321
ҡыҫҡаһы/322
ахырыһы/321
ҡаршы/321
ҡаршы/322
себә/320
тегә/320
дә/321
дә/322
әлдә/322
хәлдә/321
тигәндә/322
әйткәндә/321
әйткәндә/322
нигеҙҙә/321
безә-безә/320
ләбәйкә/322
мә-кә-кә/319
әллә/321
әллә/322
гәлә-гәлә/320
һөҙөмтәлә/321
мә/322
әйтмә/321
өҫтәүенә/321
террә/320
дөррә/320
төррә/320
билдәләүенсә/321
киреһенсә/321
минеңсә/322
ғәҙәтсә/322
әлбиттә/322
әлбәттә/322
шәттә/322
әләйһә/321
етмәһә/321
кешшә/320
көшшә/320
мә-ә/319
